Massachusetts, session 194th, S1748.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 7B of Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking the 
sentence beginning after “(8)” in line 84 and inserting thereof the following:- 
"Every school bus shall be equipped with safety belts for the operator thereof and for 
every seat that is designated to a pupil, and said operator and pupils shall securely fasten said 
seat belts while the school bus is in motion”